Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.42.020

Qualification, removal, code of ethics, duties.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, every elective and appointive officer and all employees of code cities shall: (1) Be possessed of the qualifications and be subject to forfeiture of office, impeachment or removal and recall as provided in chapter 42.04 RCW and *RCW 9.81.040; and (2) provide official bonds in accordance with the requirements of this title, and as required in compliance with chapters 42.08 and 48.28 RCW.

When vacancies in public offices in code cities shall occur the term of a replacement officer shall be fixed as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW. A public officer charged with misconduct as defined in chapter 42.20 RCW, shall be charged and, upon conviction, punished as provided for such misconduct in chapter 42.20 RCW. The officers and employees of code cities shall be guided and governed by the code of ethics as provided in chapter 42.23 RCW. Vouchers for the payment of public funds and the provisions for certifying the same shall be as provided in chapter 42.24 RCW. The meetings of any board, agency, or commission of a code city shall be open to the public to the extent and notice given in the manner required by **chapter 42.32 RCW.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.42.020.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 9.81.040 was repealed by 2023 c 102 s 11.

**(2) RCW 42.32.010 and 42.32.020 were repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 250 s 15; later enactment, see chapter 42.30 RCW. RCW 42.32.030 was recodified as RCW 42.30.035 pursuant to 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 30.

Recall of elective officers: State Constitution Art. 1 ss 33, 34 (Amendment 8); chapter 29A.56 RCW.

Residence qualifications of officials and employees: RCW 35.21.200.